Hawaii statutes.
§502-73 Same, open to inspection. The
clerks of the circuit courts shall carefully preserve the books of record
deposited with them as provided by section 502-72, filing the same with the
records of the court. The records, both while in the custody of the
acknowledging officers and after such filing, shall be open at all reasonable
times to the inspection of any responsible person, without fee or reward. [L
1888, c 18, §3; RL 1925, §3166; RL 1935, §5152; RL 1945, §12752; RL 1955,
§343-45; HRS §502-73; am L 1972, c 125, §1(e)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next